Florida, session 2026, SB400.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 16 17 Section 1.âParagraph (l) of subsection (4) and paragraph 18 (a) of subsection (9) of section 394.9082, Florida Statutes, are 19 amended, and paragraph (o) is added to subsection (3) of that 20 section, to read: 21 394.9082âBehavioral health managing entities.â 22 (3)âDEPARTMENT DUTIES.âThe department shall: 23 (o)âRoutinely monitor the managing entityâs utilization of 24 all available funds and take any necessary steps, up to and 25 including potential corrective action, to reduce 26 underutilization within the managing entityâs network. 27 (4)âCONTRACT WITH MANAGING ENTITIES.â 28 (l)âEvery 2 years, the department shall conduct a 29 comprehensive, multiyear review of the revenues, expenditures, 30 and financial positions of managing entities covering the most 31 recent 2 consecutive fiscal years. The review must include a 32 comprehensive system-of-care analysis and a comprehensive 33 financial utilization analysis. The department shall submit the 34 review to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the 35 Speaker of the House of Representatives by November 1 of every 36 other year, beginning in 2023. 37 (9)âFUNDING FOR MANAGING ENTITIES.â 38 (a)âA contract established between the department and a 39 managing entity under this section must shall be funded by 40 general revenue, other applicable state funds, or applicable 41 federal funding sources. A managing entity may carry forward 42 documented unexpended state funds from one fiscal year to the 43 next, but the cumulative amount carried forward may not exceed 8 44 percent of the annual amount of the contract. Any unexpended 45 state funds in excess of that percentage must shall be returned 46 to the department. The funds carried forward may not be used in 47 a way that would increase future recurring obligations or for 48 any program or service that was not authorized under the 49 existing contract with the department. A managing entity shall 50 ensure maximum subcontract utilization of current year allocated 51 funds within its network and may not intentionally reserve 52 current year allocated funds for carryforward planning without 53 the express advanced approval of the department. Expenditures of 54 funds carried forward must shall be separately reported to the 55 department. Any unexpended funds that remain at the end of the 56 contract period must shall be returned to the department. Funds 57 carried forward may be retained through contract renewals and 58 new contract procurements as long as the same managing entity is 59 retained by the department. 60 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.